Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
 ORS 610.150 is amended to read:
610.150. (1) As used in this section:
(a) “Area of known wolf activity” means an area designated  by the State Department of
Fish and Wildlife as having known wolf activity.
[(a)] (b)  “Livestock” means  ratites, psittacines, horses, mules, jackasses, cattle, llamas, alpacas,
sheep, goats, swine, bison,  domesticated fowl and any fur-bearing animal bred and maintained com-
mercially, or otherwise, within pens, cages or hutches.
[(b)] (c)  “Working dog” means any animal of the species Canis familiaris used to  aid in the
herding or guarding of livestock.
(2) The State Department of Agriculture shall establish and implement  a wolf depredation com-
pensation and financial assistance grant program,  using moneys in the Wolf Management Compen-
sation and Proactive Trust Fund established under ORS 610.155, to provide grants to assist counties
to implement county programs under which:
(a) Compensation is [ paid] provided to persons who suffer  probable or confirmed loss or injury
to livestock or working dogs due to wolf depredation; and
(b) Financial assistance is provided  to persons who implement livestock management techniques
or nonlethal wolf deterrence techniques designed to discourage wolf depredation of livestock.
(3) Subject to available funding in the Wolf Management  Compensation and Proactive Trust
Fund established  under ORS 610.155, a county qualifies for a grant [ under the wolf depredation
compensation and financial assistance grant program ] if the county:
(a) Establishes a county program to[ :] provide compensation and financial assistance  as de-
scribed in subsection (2) of this section.
[(A) Compensate persons who  suffer loss or injury to livestock or working dogs due to wolf
depredation; and]
[(B) Provide financial assistance to persons  who implement livestock management techniques or
nonlethal wolf deterrence techniques designed to discourage wolf depredation of livestock. ]
(b) Contributes an amount of moneys equal to 10 percent of the amount necessary to implement,
during the calendar year, the county program.
(c) Establishes [ a procedure ] procedures by which persons  who:
Enrolled Senate Bill 777 (SB 777-A) Page 1
(A) Are  applying for compensation  [ under the county program ], as described in subsection
(2)(a) of this section,  provide  evidence of the  probable or confirmed  loss or injury to livestock
or working dogs due to wolf depredation[ . Evidence of the loss or injury must include ], including a
finding by the  State Department of Fish and Wildlife or the department’s designated agent that wolf
depredation was the probable cause of the loss or injury.
(B) Are applying for  financial assistance, as described in subsection (2)(b) of this section,
provide an estimate of the potential cost of any  livestock management techniques or nonle-
thal wolf deterrence techniques the person plans to use.
(d) Establishes a county advisory committee to oversee the county program, consisting of one
county commissioner, two members who own or manage livestock and two members who support
wolf conservation or coexistence with wolves. The county advisory committee, once established by
the county, shall agree upon two county business representatives to  serve as additional county ad-
visory committee members.
[(e) Establishes a procedure by  which persons applying for financial assistance under the county
program provide an estimate of the potential cost  of the livestock management techniques or nonlethal
wolf deterrence techniques designed to discourage wolf depredation. ]
(4) In  accordance with the Oregon Wolf Conservation and Management Plan, the Director of
Agriculture shall adopt rules to implement the provisions of this section, including [ but not  limited
to] rules that  require participating counties to :
(a) [ Require that ] Prioritize awarding grants to  livestock owners and managers experiencing
above-normal probable or confirmed  loss or injury to livestock  or working dogs due to wolf
depredation [ be given priority by  counties for grant moneys received under the wolf depredation com-
pensation and financial assistance grant program ].
[(b) Require counties participating in the wolf depredation compensation  and financial assistance
grant program to: ]
[(A) Prepare an annual report that specifies  the actions taken by, and compensation paid and fi-
nancial assistance provided to,  counties under the wolf depredation compensation and financial assist-
ance grant program; ]
(b) Prepare annual reports that describe the counties’ actions taken under the  county
grant programs, including the amounts provided as compensation  and financial assistance,
as described in subsection (2) of this section.
[(B)] (c) Distribute grant program funds, to the extent possible, in an equal and balanced manner
between [ payments to compensate for loss or injury to livestock or working dogs due to wolf
depredation and payments to implement livestock management techniques or nonlethal  wolf deterrence
techniques designed to discourage  wolf depredation of livestock ] compensation and financial as-
sistance, as described in subsection (2) of this section , with a minimum of [ 30] 50  percent  of
grant program funds being distributed for  [ livestock management techniques or nonlethal wolf deter-
rence techniques designed  to discourage wolf depredation of livestock; and ] financial assistance, as
described in subsection (2)(b) of this section.
[(C) Establish compensation rates for loss or injury to livestock or working dogs  due to wolf
depredation that are based on fair market value and the recommendation of the county  advisory com-
mittee described in subsection (3)(d) of this section. ]
(d) Allow county advisory committees described in subsection (3)(d)  of this section to
determine an amount of compensation, as described in  subsection (2)(a) of this section, for
each probable or confirmed loss or injury to a livestock  animal or working dog due to wolf
depredation that is:
(A) Not more than $25,000 per livestock animal or working dog;
(B) Up to five times the fair market value of a cow calf or yearling, sheep or goat;
(C) Up to three times the fair market value of a cow not described in subparagraph  (B)
of this paragraph; and
(D) The fair market value of a  horse, a livestock animal not specifically described in this
paragraph or a working dog.
Enrolled Senate Bill 777 (SB 777-A) Page 2
[(c)] (e)  Establish eligibility requirements for compensation , as described in subsection (2)(a)
of this section,  under county programs that ensure, contingent upon available funds, that:
(A) Outside an area of known wolf activity, [ as designated by the  State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, confirmed loss  or injury to livestock or working dogs shall be compensated ] the compen-
sation is provided regardless of the preexistence of wolf deterrence techniques;
(B) Within an area of known wolf activity, [ as designated by  the State Department of Fish and
Wildlife, confirmed loss or injury to livestock or working dogs, as well  as missing livestock above the
level based on loss  or injury attributable to causes other than wolf depredation established by the
county advisory committee described in subsection  (3)(d) of this section, shall be compensable ] the
compensation is provided only  if owners have demonstrated implementation  of best management
practices to deter wolves, including reasonable use of  nonlethal methods when practicable[ , giving
priority for compensation of confirmed losses at fair market value and with other  compensation claims
determined according to the recommendation of the county advisory committee ]; and
(C) Any compensation [ for loss or injury to livestock or working dogs due to wolf depredation ] is
based upon a finding  by the local advisory committee that the person did not unreasonably or
purposefully create circumstances that attract wolves or encourage conflict between  wolves and
livestock or working dogs.
(5) Each biennium the State Department of Agriculture shall :
(a) Prepare  a report that specifies the actions taken by counties, compensation [ paid] and fi-
nancial assistance provided by counties , and the financial  assistance provided to counties , under
the wolf depredation compensation and financial assistance grant program[ , and];
(b) [ shall] Submit the report , in the manner provided in  ORS 192.245,  to  committees or in-
terim committees of  the Legislative Assembly  related to natural resources;  and
(c) Post the report on the department’s website for public access.
(6) The State Department of Agriculture may use moneys in the Wolf Management  Compen-
sation and Proactive Trust Fund established under ORS 610.155 to pay expenses incurred in admin-
istering the wolf depredation compensation and financial assistance grant program.
Passed by Senate March 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Obadiah Rutledge, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Passed by House June 3, 2025
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 777 (SB 777-A) Page 3